Utah statutes.
54-8-6.   Creation of improvement district -- Petition by property owners --
Resolution of governing body -- Utilities to submit reports.
(1) (a)  A governing body may, upon a petition signed by two-thirds of the
owners of the real property and the owners of not less than two-thirds in
value of the real property, as shown by the last assessment rolls, of any
proposed district requesting the creation of an improvement district as
provided for in this chapter, pass a resolution at any regular or special
meeting declaring that it finds that the improvement district proposed is in
the public interest.
(b)  In order to pass a resolution under Subsection (1)(a), the governing body
shall determine that the formation of the local improvement district for the
purposes set out in this chapter will promote the public convenience,
necessity, and welfare.
(2)  Each resolution adopted under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  state that the costs and expenses will be levied and assessed upon the
property benefitted;
(b)  request that each public utility corporation serving such area by
overhead electric or communication facilities shall, within 120 days after the
receipt of the resolution, make a study of the cost of conversion of its
facilities in such area to underground service; and
(c)  require that the public utilities be provided with the name and address
of the owner of each parcel or lot within the proposed improvement district,
if known, and, if not known, the description of the property and other matters
required by the public utility corporations in order to perform the work
involved in the cost study.
(3)  Each public service corporation serving the improvement district area by
overhead electric or communication facilities shall:
(a)  within 120 days after receipt of the resolution, make a study of the
costs of conversion of its facilities in the district to underground service;
and
(b)  provide the governing body and make available to its office a report,
prepared jointly with each other public service corporation serving the
improvement district area by overhead electric or communication facilities, as
to the results of the study.
(4)  The governing body shall make each report under Subsection (3) available
in its office to each owner of land within the improvement district.
